Utah statutes.
63B-1b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Agency bonds" means any bond, note, contract, or other evidence of indebtedness representing loans or grants made by an authorizing agency.

(2)  "Authorized official" means the state treasurer or other person authorized by a bond document to perform the required action.

(3)  "Authorizing agency" means the board, person, or unit with legal responsibility for administering and managing revolving loan funds.

(4)  "Bond document" means:

(a)  a resolution of the commission; or

(b)  an indenture or other similar document authorized by the commission that authorizes and secures outstanding revenue bonds from time to time.

(5)  "Commission" means the State Bonding Commission created in Section 63B-1-201.

(6)  "Revenue bonds" means any special fund revenue bonds issued under this chapter.

(7)  "Revolving Loan Funds" means:

(a)  the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund, created in Section 73-10-24;

(b)  the Water Resources Construction Fund, created in Section 73-10-8;

(c)  the Water Resources Cities Water Loan Fund, created in Section 73-10-22;

(d)  the Clean Fuel Conversion Funds, created in Title 19, Chapter 1, Part 4, Clean Fuels and Vehicle Technology Program Act;

(e)  the Water Development Security Fund and its subaccounts created in Section 73-10c-5;

(f)  the Agriculture Resource Development Fund, created in Section 4-18-6;

(g)  the Utah Rural Rehabilitation Fund, created in Section 4-19-4;

(h)  the Permanent Community Impact Fund, created in Section 35A-8-303;

(i)  the Petroleum Storage Tank Loan Fund, created in Section 19-6-405.3; and

(j)  the Transportation Infrastructure Loan Fund, created in Section 72-2-202.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

